District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2885.05

Licensing of pharmacists.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1102(c), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-2004, 2-2005.
Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.